Vermont, session 2025-2026, H489.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.105 is amended to read:
Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services - communications and information
technology
Personal services 82,994,362 82,994,362
Operating expenses 62,547,212 61,761,212
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Source of funds
General fund 209,808 209,808
Special funds 511,723 511,723
Internal service funds 144,820,043 144,034,043
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.145 is amended to read:
Sec. B.145 Total general government
Source of funds
General fund 117,405,610 117,405,610
Transportation fund 4,292,149 4,292,149
Special funds 31,882,209 31,882,209
Federal funds 1,467,374 1,467,374
Internal service funds 214,635,950 213,849,950
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 2 of 73
Interdepartmental transfers 7,053,789 7,053,789
Enterprise funds 4,298 4,298
Pension trust funds 4,800,305 4,800,305
Private purpose trust funds 1,329,205 1,329,205
Total 382,870,889 382,084,889
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.204 is amended to read:
Sec. B.204 Judiciary
Personal services 58,439,095 58,827,799
Operating expenses 12,479,384 14,640,960
Grants 121,030 121,030
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
Source of funds
General fund 63,414,698 65,964,978
Special funds 4,503,401 4,503,401
Federal funds 953,928 953,928
Interdepartmental transfers 2,167,482 2,167,482
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
Sec. 4. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.205 is amended to read:
Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
Personal services 17,309,679 17,548,979
Operating expenses 2,034,016 2,202,516
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 3 of 73
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Source of funds
General fund 18,734,634 19,142,434
Federal funds 31,000 31,000
Interdepartmental transfers 578,061 578,061
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.206.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.206.1 Crime Victims Advocates
Personal services 3,016,156 3,016,156
Operating expenses 104,396 142,396
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Source of funds
General fund 3,120,552 3,158,552
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.208 is amended to read:
Sec. B.208 Public safety - administration
Personal services 4,620,756 5,397,783
Operating expenses 6,022,923 6,022,923
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Source of funds
General fund 6,179,193 8,092,770
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 4 of 73
Special funds 4,105 4,105
Federal funds 396,362 396,362
Interdepartmental transfers 4,064,019 2,927,469
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Sec. 7. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.210 is amended to read:
Sec. B.210 Public safety - criminal justice services
Personal services 5,387,100 4,705,897
Operating expenses 2,152,467 2,152,467
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Source of funds
General fund 1,829,099 2,172,295
Special funds 4,975,847 3,951,448
Federal funds 734,621 734,621
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Sec. 8. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.236 is amended to read:
Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
Personal services 927,697 952,559
Operating expenses 115,103 125,378
Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
Source of funds
General fund 953,800 988,937
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 5 of 73
Federal funds 89,000 89,000
Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
Sec. 9. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.241 is amended to read:
Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
Source of funds
General fund 228,238,448 233,526,438
Transportation fund 20,250,000 20,250,000
Special funds 119,824,272 118,799,873
Tobacco fund 672,579 672,579
Federal funds 162,959,452 162,959,452
Interdepartmental transfers 16,031,869 14,895,319
Enterprise funds 15,070,107 15,070,107
Total 563,046,727 566,173,768
Sec. 10. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.300 is amended to read:
Sec. B.300 Human services - agency of human services - secretary’s office
Personal services 16,219,746 18,219,746
Operating expenses 7,220,486 6,062,286
Grants 3,795,202 3,795,202
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Source of funds
General fund 12,913,202 11,923,905
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 6 of 73
Special funds 135,517 135,517
Federal funds 13,565,080 11,606,177
Global Commitment fund 0 4,300,000
Interdepartmental transfers 621,635 111,635
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Sec. 11. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.301 is amended to read:
Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office - global commitment
Grants 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Total 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Source of funds
General fund 668,380,623 716,109,638
Special funds 32,047,905 32,047,905
Tobacco fund 21,049,373 21,049,373
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
Federal funds 1,285,494,243 1,363,223,270
Interdepartmental transfers 4,487,210 4,124,245
Total 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Sec. 12. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.305 is amended to read:
Sec. B.305 AHS - administrative fund
Personal services 330,000 330,000
Operating expenses 13,170,000 16,870,000
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 7 of 73
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000 17,200,000
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Sec. 13. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.306 is amended to read:
Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access - administration
Personal services 134,929,148 136,693,560
Operating expenses 44,171,193 39,250,661
Grants 3,112,301 3,112,301
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Source of funds
General fund 39,872,315 42,023,781
Special funds 4,733,015 4,733,015
Federal funds 128,790,580 124,836,223
Global Commitment fund 4,308,574 4,308,574
Interdepartmental transfers 4,508,158 3,154,929
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Sec. 14. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.307 is amended to read:
Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
global commitment
Personal services 547,983 547,983
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 8 of 73
Grants 899,550,794 964,407,046
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 900,098,777 964,955,029
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Sec. 15. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.309 is amended to read:
Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
state only
Grants 63,033,948 67,780,595
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Source of funds
General fund 62,151,546 62,308,757
Global Commitment fund 882,402 5,471,838
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Sec. 16. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.310 is amended to read:
Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid non-waiver
matched
Grants 34,994,888 38,232,431
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
Source of funds
General fund 12,511,405 13,459,034
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 9 of 73
Federal funds 22,483,483 24,773,397
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
Sec. 17. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.311 is amended to read:
Sec. B.311 Health - administration and support
Personal services 8,373,168 8,373,168
Operating expenses 7,519,722 8,166,662
Grants 7,985,727 7,985,727
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Source of funds
General fund 3,189,843 3,513,313
Special funds 2,308,186 2,308,186
Federal funds 11,040,433 11,363,903
Global Commitment fund 7,173,924 7,173,924
Interdepartmental transfers 166,231 166,231
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Sec. 18. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.312 is amended to read:
Sec. B.312 Health - public health
Personal services 67,812,371 67,812,371
Operating expenses 11,025,497 11,025,497
Grants 46,766,832 46,866,832
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 10 of 73
Source of funds
General fund 12,908,892 13,008,892
Special funds 24,906,804 24,906,804
Tobacco fund 1,088,918 1,088,918
Federal funds 64,038,301 64,038,301
Global Commitment fund 17,036,150 17,036,150
Interdepartmental transfers 5,600,635 5,600,635
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
Sec. 19. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.313 is amended to read:
Sec. B.313 Health - substance use programs
Personal services 6,570,967 6,570,967
Operating expenses 511,500 511,500
Grants 58,215,510 59,240,635
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Source of funds
General fund 6,672,061 7,697,186
Special funds 2,413,678 2,413,678
Tobacco fund 949,917 949,917
Federal funds 15,456,754 15,456,754
Global Commitment fund 39,805,567 39,805,567
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 11 of 73
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Sec. 20. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.314 is amended to read:
Sec. B.314 Mental health - mental health
Personal services 50,191,086 50,191,086
Operating expenses 5,517,999 5,709,973
Grants 270,625,138 272,536,080
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Source of funds
General fund 25,555,311 26,279,270
Special funds 1,718,092 1,718,092
Federal funds 11,436,913 12,661,803
Global Commitment fund 287,609,767 287,763,834
Interdepartmental transfers 14,140 14,140
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Sec. 21. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.316 is amended to read:
Sec. B.316 Department for children and families - administration &
support services
Personal services 46,644,080 44,844,080
Operating expenses 17,560,755 19,402,705
Grants 5,627,175 5,627,175
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 12 of 73
Source of funds
General fund 39,722,724 40,113,958
Special funds 2,781,912 2,781,912
Federal funds 24,448,223 24,098,939
Global Commitment fund 2,417,024 2,417,024
Interdepartmental transfers 462,127 462,127
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
Sec. 22. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.317 is amended to read:
Sec. B.317 Department for children and families - family services
Personal services 45,197,694 45,286,553
Operating expenses 5,315,309 5,315,309
Grants 98,251,027 97,732,465
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
Source of funds
General fund 58,838,741 59,984,059
Special funds 729,587 729,587
Federal funds 34,666,196 36,180,206
Global Commitment fund 54,514,506 51,425,475
Interdepartmental transfers 15,000 15,000
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 13 of 73
Sec. 23. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.318 is amended to read:
Sec. B.318 Department for children and families - child development
Personal services 5,908,038 5,908,038
Operating expenses 813,321 813,321
Grants 223,329,336 211,815,836
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Source of funds
General fund 76,723,518 51,443,165
Special funds 96,312,000 109,512,000
Federal funds 43,511,414 42,902,383
Global Commitment fund 13,503,763 14,679,647
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Sec. 24. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.319 is amended to read:
Sec. B.319 Department for children and families - office of child support
Personal services 13,157,660 13,061,794
Operating expenses 3,759,992 3,759,992
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Source of funds
General fund 5,200,064 5,163,429
Special funds 455,719 455,719
Federal funds 10,874,269 10,815,038
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 14 of 73
Interdepartmental transfers 387,600 387,600
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Sec. 25. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.320 is amended to read:
Sec. B.320 Department for children and families - aid to aged, blind and
disabled
Personal services 2,252,206 2,481,741
Grants 10,717,444 10,369,155
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
Source of funds
General fund 7,376,133 7,368,843
Global Commitment fund 5,593,517 5,482,053
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
Sec. 26. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.321 is amended to read:
Sec. B.321 Department for children and families - general assistance
Personal services 15,000 15,000
Grants 11,054,252 10,702,625
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Source of funds
General fund 10,811,345 10,486,987
Federal funds 11,320 11,070
Global Commitment fund 246,587 219,568
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 15 of 73
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Sec. 27. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.322 is amended to read:
Sec. B.322 Department for children and families - 3SquaresVT
Grants 44,377,812 45,677,812
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
Source of funds
Federal funds 44,377,812 45,677,812
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
Sec. 28. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.323 is amended to read:
Sec. B.323 Department for children and families - reach up
Operating expenses 23,821 23,821
Grants 37,230,488 36,730,493
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
Source of funds
General fund 24,733,042 24,233,047
Special funds 5,970,229 5,970,229
Federal funds 2,806,330 2,806,330
Global Commitment fund 3,744,708 3,744,708
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 16 of 73
Sec. 29. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.325 is amended to read:
Sec. B.325 Department for children and families - office of economic
opportunity
Personal services 817,029 1,042,639
Operating expenses 100,407 100,407
Grants 35,466,283 35,812,536
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Source of funds
General fund 28,178,010 28,687,068
Special funds 83,135 83,135
Federal funds 4,935,273 4,998,078
Global Commitment fund 3,187,301 3,187,301
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Sec. 30. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.329 is amended to read:
Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - administration &
support
Personal services 45,217,977 46,217,977
Operating expenses 6,472,558 6,714,680
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
Source of funds
General fund 22,916,281 24,037,342
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 17 of 73
Special funds 1,390,457 1,390,457
Federal funds 26,063,097 26,184,158
Global Commitment fund 35,000 35,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,285,700 1,285,700
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
Sec. 31. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.330 is amended to read:
Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - advocacy and
independent living grants
Grants 24,571,060 24,781,798
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Source of funds
General fund 8,392,303 8,504,605
Federal funds 7,321,114 7,321,114
Global Commitment fund 8,857,643 8,956,079
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Sec. 32. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.332 is amended to read:
Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - vocational
rehabilitation
Grants 10,179,845 9,179,845
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
Source of funds
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 18 of 73
General fund 1,371,845 371,845
Federal funds 7,558,000 7,558,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,250,000 1,250,000
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
Sec. 33. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.333 is amended to read:
Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - developmental
services
Grants 329,299,344 331,262,271
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Source of funds
General fund 132,732 132,732
Special funds 15,463 15,463
Federal funds 403,573 403,573
Global Commitment fund 328,697,576 330,660,503
Interdepartmental transfers 50,000 50,000
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Sec. 34. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - TBI home and
community based waiver
Grants 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 19 of 73
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
Sec. 35. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging and independent living - Long Term Care
Grants 293,584,545 347,376,122
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
Source of funds
General fund 498,579 498,579
Federal funds 2,450,000 2,450,000
Global Commitment fund 290,635,966 344,427,543
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
Sec. 36. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.338 is amended to read:
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 147,472,104 148,472,104
Operating expenses 24,914,205 25,249,795
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Source of funds
General fund 162,807,888 163,643,478
Special funds 935,963 935,963
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 20 of 73
Federal funds 499,888 999,888
Global Commitment fund 2,746,255 2,746,255
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315 396,315
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Sec. 37. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.342 is amended to read:
Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home - care and support services
Personal services 17,631,222 17,595,290
Operating expenses 5,013,462 13,247,462
Grants 0 1,583,157
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Source of funds
General fund 4,320,687 11,224,018
Special funds 10,051,903 12,450,095
Federal funds 8,272,094 8,751,796
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Sec. 38. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.347 is amended to read:
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,328,118,806 1,364,156,647
Special funds 202,800,452 218,398,644
Tobacco fund 23,088,208 23,088,208
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 21 of 73
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
Federal funds 1,803,398,922 1,882,012,745
Global Commitment fund 1,980,839,553 2,108,560,133
Internal service funds 490,853 490,853
Interdepartmental transfers 32,893,535 34,367,341
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 5,404,708,886 5,664,153,128
Sec. 39. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.501 is amended to read:
Sec. B.501 Education - education services
Personal services 28,237,700 28,312,700
Operating expenses 1,134,912 1,134,912
Grants 322,345,763 322,345,763
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
Source of funds
General fund 6,387,955 6,462,955
Special funds 3,033,144 3,033,144
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Federal funds 340,584,414 340,584,414
Interdepartmental transfers 962,474 962,474
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 22 of 73
Sec. 40. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.503 is amended to read:
Sec. B.503 Education - state-placed students
Grants 20,000,000 19,000,000
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,000,000 19,000,000
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Sec. 41. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504 Education - adult education and literacy
Grants 4,694,183 4,997,820
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
Source of funds
General fund 3,778,133 4,081,770
Federal funds 916,050 916,050
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
Sec. 42. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504.1 Education - Flexible Pathways
Grants 11,361,755 11,564,179
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
Source of funds
General fund 921,500 921,500
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 23 of 73
Education fund 10,440,255 10,642,679
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
Sec. 43. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.505 is amended to read:
Sec. B.505 Education - adjusted education payment
Grants 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Source of funds
Education fund 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Sec. 44. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.508 is amended to read:
Sec. B.508 Education - nutrition
Grants 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
Sec. 45. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.516 is amended to read:
Sec. B.516 Total general education
Source of funds
General fund 228,890,519 229,269,156
Special funds 23,651,687 23,651,687
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 24 of 73
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Education fund 2,323,283,242 2,308,585,666
Federal funds 354,654,849 354,654,849
Global Commitment fund 260,000 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,467,771 1,467,771
Pension trust funds 3,572,780 3,572,780
Total 2,936,531,236 2,922,212,297
Sec. 46. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.704 is amended to read:
Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation - forestry
Personal services 7,880,566 7,913,766
Operating expenses 1,005,046 1,005,046
Grants 1,712,423 1,713,923
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Source of funds
General fund 6,299,512 6,334,212
Special funds 547,215 547,215
Federal funds 3,394,931 3,394,931
Interdepartmental transfers 356,377 356,377
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Sec. 47. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.710 is amended to read:
Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation - air and waste management
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 25 of 73
Personal services 27,995,328 27,995,328
Operating expenses 10,788,954 10,816,954
Grants 4,943,000 4,943,000
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Source of funds
General fund 199,372 227,372
Special funds 24,643,580 24,643,580
Federal funds 18,800,064 18,800,064
Interdepartmental transfers 84,266 84,266
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Sec. 48. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.711 is amended to read:
Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation - office of water programs
Personal services 50,153,806 50,153,806
Operating expenses 8,362,915 8,370,915
Grants 92,365,140 92,365,140
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
Source of funds
General fund 11,887,629 11,895,629
Special funds 30,967,150 30,967,150
Federal funds 107,154,542 107,154,542
Interdepartmental transfers 872,540 872,540
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 26 of 73
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
Sec. 49. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.714 is amended to read:
Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
Source of funds
General fund 42,792,800 42,863,500
Special funds 81,275,829 81,275,829
Fish and wildlife fund 10,418,331 10,418,331
Federal funds 152,068,301 152,068,301
Interdepartmental transfers 14,131,324 14,131,324
Total 300,686,585 300,757,285
Sec. 50. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100 is amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2025 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
* * *
(d) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for
the following:
* * *
(8) $835,073 General Fund for the Bridges to Health Program; and
(9) $400,000 $550,000 General Fund for the Vermont Household Health
Insurance Survey; and
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 27 of 73
(10) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity.
(e) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
* * *
(2) $1,034,065 General Fund to extend 10 Economic Services Division
limited service positions, including associated operating costs, in support of the
General Assistance Emergency Housing program; and
(3) $332,000 General Fund for a 2-1-1 service line contract to operate
24 hours seven days per week;
(4) $340,000 General Fund and $660,000 federal funds for the Office of
Child Support mainframe transition planning. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 703, unless otherwise reverted by a future act of the General Assembly, these
appropriations shall carry forward until fully expended; and
(5) $1,800,000 General Fund shall be added to the appropriation made
in Sec. B.1102(b)(4) of this act for the Comprehensive Child Welfare
Information System.
* * *
(n) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2025,
funds are appropriated for the following:
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 28 of 73
(1) $3,913,200 $5,586,324 General Fund and $5,366,383 $7,713,259
federal funds to be used for Global Commitment match for the Medicaid
Global Payment Program. To the extent that at a future date the Global
Payment Program ceases to operate as a program or changes methodology to a
retrospective payment program, any resulting one-time General Fund spending
authority remaining at that time shall be reverted. If the Human Services
Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b has not been replenished in
accordance with subdivision (b)(21) of Sec. B.1102 of this act, the remaining
unallocated General Fund balance shall be reserved in the Human Services
Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b up to the amount
appropriated in this subdivision.
(o) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $9,279,583 $13,299,583 Global Commitment for the Medicaid
Global Payment Program;
(2) $150,000 General Fund to conduct a technical analysis of Vermont’s
health insurance markets; and
(3) $100,000 General Fund to implement the expansion of Medicare
Savings Programs eligibility;
(4) $10,000,000 General Fund for Provider Stabilization Grants; and
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 29 of 73
(5) $11,000,000 General Fund for an alternative payment model
reconciliation payment to Brattleboro Retreat. All or a portion of these funds
may also be used as matching funds to the Agency of Human Services Global
Commitment Program to provide State match. If funds are used as matching
funds to the Agency of Human Services Global Commitment Program to
provide State match, the commensurate amount of Global Commitment Fund
spending authority may be requested during the Global Commitment Transfer
process pursuant to Sec. E.301.1 of this act.
* * *
(w) Office of the State Treasurer. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $14,000,000 General Fund for redeeming State of Vermont general
obligation bonds prior to maturity.
Sec. 51. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.100 is amended to read:
Sec. D.100 ALLOCATIONS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
(a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
exceed available revenues.
(1) The sum of $575,662 is allocated from the Current Use
Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
the Use Tax Reimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 30 of 73
amounts in excess of $575,662 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $22,106,740
$28,238,050 from the property transfer tax and surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Trust Fund shall be transferred into the General Fund.
(A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
transfer tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the
affordable housing bond pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 314 shall be offset by the
reduction of $1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a. The fiscal year 2025 appropriation of $22,106,740
$28,238,050 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board reflects the
$1,500,000 reduction. The affordable housing bond and related property
transfer tax and surcharge provisions are repealed after the life of the bond on
July 1, 2039. Once the bond is retired, the $1,500,000 reduction in the
appropriation to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall be
restored.
(3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), amounts in excess of
$7,772,373 $9,052,113 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 31 of 73
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund. The $7,772,373 $9,052,113 shall be allocated as follows:
(A) $6,404,540 $7,300,358 for disbursement to regional planning
commissions in a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
(B) $931,773 $1,187,721 for disbursement to municipalities in a
manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
(C) $436,060 $564,034 to the Agency of Digital Services for the
Vermont Center for Geographic Information.
Sec. 52. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.101 is amended to read:
Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts are
transferred from the funds indicated:
(1) From the General Fund to the:
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$73,212,880 $78,235,088.34.
* * *
(J) Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund (#21555): $830,000
$6,500,000.
(K) Education Fund (#20205): $25,000,000.
(L) Medical Insurance Fund (#55100): $18,500,000.
(M) Correctional Industries Fund (#59100): $3,135,443.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 32 of 73
(N) Act 250 Permit Fund (#21260): $900,000.
(O) State Liability Self-Insurance Fund (#56200): $3,000,000.
(P) Emergency Personnel Survivor’s Benefit Fund (#21884):
$220,000.
(2) From the Transportation Fund to the:
(A) Vermont Recreational Trails Fund (#21455): $370,000.
(B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
Fund (#21575): $523,966.
(C)(B) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$316,745.
(D)(C) Notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 13(c), the Transportation Fund
transfer to the Central Garage fund in fiscal year 2025 shall be $0.
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025:
(1) The following amounts shall be transferred to the General Fund from
the funds indicated:
(A) Cannabis Regulation Fund (#21998): $12,000,000
$15,417,084.32.
(B) AHS Central Office Earned Federal Receipts (#22005):
$4,641,960.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 33 of 73
(C) Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $7,000,000
$6,139,162.
(D) Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $21,100,000 $9,543,353.
(E) Tobacco Litigation Settlement Fund (#21370): $3,000,000.
(F) Financial Institutions Supervision Fund (#21065): $1,100,000.
(F) Workforce Education and Training Fund (#21913):
$2,598,921.75.
(G) Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund (#21994): the balance of
the fund at the close of fiscal year 2025.
(2) The following estimated amounts, which may be all or a portion of
unencumbered fund balances, shall be transferred from the following funds to
the General Fund. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall report
to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July meeting the final amounts transferred
from each fund and certify that such transfers will not impair the agency,
office, or department reliant upon each fund from meeting its statutory
requirements.
(A) AG-Fees & Reimbursements-Court Order Fund (#21638):
$2,000,000.
(B) Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100): $6,500,000 $10,995,595.
(3) $66,935,000 $63,560,450.50 of the net unencumbered fund balances
in the Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21075), the Captive
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 34 of 73
Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21085), and the Securities
Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21080) shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.3 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
under the Federal Public Assistance Program, in fiscal year 2025, the Secretary
of Administration may provide funding from the Emergency Relief and
Assistance Fund that was transferred pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(J) of this
section to subgrantees prior to the completion of a project. In fiscal year years
2025 and 2026, up to 70 percent of the State funding match on the nonfederal
share of an approved project for municipalities that were impacted by the
August and December 2023 and 2024 flooding events in counties that are
eligible for Federal Emergency Management Agency Public Assistance funds
under federal disaster declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-4810-
VT, DR-4816-VT, and DR-4826-VT may be advanced at the request of a
municipality.
(2) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.1 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
Under the Federal Public Assistance Program, the Secretary of Administration
shall increase the standard State funding match on the nonfederal share of an
approved project to the highest percentage possible given available funding for
municipalities in counties that were impacted by the August and December
2023 and 2024 flooding events and are eligible for Federal Emergency
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 35 of 73
Management Agency Public Assistance funds under federal disaster
declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-4810-VT, DR-4816-VT, and
DR-4826-VT.
Sec. 53. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.102 is amended to read:
Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
accounts indicated:
* * *
3150892104 MH – Case Management Serv $350,000.00 $350,199.34
* * *
1100892208 AOA – VT Housing Finance Agency $3,000,000.00
1100892403 AOA – Health Equity Community Grants $500,000.00
1120020000 Tuition Assistance Program $133,877.86
1120892401 DHR – New Position in DHR Ops $477,769.00
1120892402 DHR – New Position in VTHR Ops $40,726.07
1140010000 Tax Operation Costs $1,267,062.22
1140060000 Reappraisal and Listing Payments $35,270.75
1140070000 Use Tax Reimbursement Program $37,864.25
1140330000 Renter Rebates $2,186,940.33
1140892403 Tax – Child Care Contr Positions $3,591,823.02
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 36 of 73
1260980000 Debt Service $235,445.15
1266892401 VPIC – Pension System Assets $5,000.00
2100892201 AG – Racial Disparities $48,465.00
2120892203 JUD – County Court House HVAC $800,000.00
2120892402 JUD – Essex County Courthouse Reno $50,000.00
2130400000 SIUS Parent Account $395,749.64
2150010000 Mil Admin/TAGO $142,789.80
2150050000 Mil Vet Affairs Office $100,000.00
2160892201 CCVS – VT Forensic Nursing $246.43
2160892304 CCVS – Kurn Hattin Survivor $250.00
2200010000 Administration Division $167,222.00
3310000000 Commission on Women $25,390.43
3330892401 GMCB – VHCURES Database Implemen $545,782.90
3400892111 Supp New Americans Refugee $23,431.00
3400892301 AHSCO – Refugee Resettlement $1,293.00
3420892405 HD – Regional Emergency Med $8,295.01
3440050000 DCFS – AABD $35,310.73
3440892110 DCF – Grants to Reachup $5.10
3440892203 DCF – Parent Child Ctrs Cap Imp $20,708.22
3440892214 DCF – Child Care Provider Workfor $294.79
4100500000 VT Department of Labor $8,000,000.00
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 37 of 73
5100070000 Education Services $100,000.00
5100892101 AOE – VSC Committee Per Diem $16,295.33
5100892102 AOA – Advisory Group Per Diem $9,018.00
5100892103 AOE – ESESAG Per Diems $8,960.00
5100892201 AOE – Comm Pub Sch Emp Hlth Ben $29,050.00
5100892202 AOE – Task Force Equit Inclusive $6,150.00
5100892302 AOE – Ethnic&Social Equity Per D $14,386.24
6100010000 Administration Management and Planning $402,052.99
6100040000 Property Tax Assessment Approp $11,692.11
6140880005 152/00 State Asst Munic Poll Cont $126.26
7100892301 Everyone Eats $144,565.43
7120892304 DED – Relocated and Remote Worker $127,314.33
8100002100 Department of Motor Vehicles $2,482.81
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the Education Fund from the
accounts indicated:
5100010000 Administration $301,041.03
5100050000 State-Placed Students $13,687,528.41
5100090000 Education Grant $359,570.31
5100110000 Small School Grant $593,700.00
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 38 of 73
5100200000 Education – Technical Education $1,802,347.44
5100210000 Education – Flexible Pathways $1,312,334.72
5100892405 AOE – Universal School Meals $6,201,479.69
Sec. 54. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.103 is amended to read:
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
provided:
(1) General Fund.
(A) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 308, an estimated amount of
$15,168,663 $15,168,660.85 shall be added to the General Fund Budget
Stabilization Reserve.
(B) $5,480,000 shall be added to the 27/53 reserve in fiscal year
2025. This action is the fiscal year 2025 contribution to the reserve for the
53rd week of Medicaid as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e and the 27th payroll
reserve as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e.
(C) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308b, $3,913,200 shall be
unreserved from the Human Services Caseload Reserve established within the
General Fund in 32 V.S.A. § 308b.
(D) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308c(a), up to $133,500,000
otherwise subject to the requirements of this provision shall, instead, be
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 39 of 73
reserved for permanent housing, property tax relief, and any other uses
determined to be in the best interests of the public in the subsequent fiscal year.
The requirements of this subdivision (D) shall extend past July 1 of the
subsequent fiscal year and expire upon completion of the current fiscal year’s
accounting closure period.
* * *
Sec. 55. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.100 is amended to read:
Sec. E.100 POSITIONS
* * *
(d) The conversion of eight limited service positions to exempt permanent
status is authorized in fiscal year 2025 as follows:
(1) Office of the Defender General:
(A) one Administrative Services Tech;
(B) two DG IT Specialist II’s;
(C) one ODG Legal Assistant I;
(D) two Staff Attorney I’s;
(E) one Financial Specialist III; and
(F) one Admin Secretary.
* * *
Sec. 56. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.100, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 56, is further amended to read:
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 40 of 73
Sec. E.100 EXECUTIVE BRANCH POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of 75 permanent positions is authorized in fiscal year
2024 for the following:
* * *
(2) Permanent exempt positions:
* * *
(F) Office of the State Treasurer:
(i) one Director – VT Saves Economic Empowerment Division;
and
(ii) one Communications and Outreach Manager – VT Saves
Economic Empowerment Division;
* * *
Sec. 57. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.301 is amended to read:
Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
* * *
(b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
total estimated sum of $24,301,185 $28,307,335 is anticipated to be certified as
State matching funds under Global Commitment as follows:
(1) $21,295,850 $25,302,000 certified State match available from local
education agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid
services under Global Commitment. This amount, combined with $29,204,150
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 41 of 73
$34,698,000 of federal funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, equals a
total estimated expenditure of $50,500,000 $60,000,000. An amount equal to
the amount of the federal matching funds for eligible special education school-
based Medicaid services under Global Commitment shall be transferred from
the Global Commitment Fund to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund
created in 16 V.S.A. § 2959a.
(2) $3,005,335 certified State match available from local designated
mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
services provided under Global Commitment.
(c) Up to $4,487,210 $3,614,245 is transferred from the Agency of Human
Services Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer
Fund consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act.
Sec. 58. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. G.109 is amended to read:
Sec. G.109 PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCAL YEARS 2025 AND
2026
(a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2024 through June
30, 2026; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 42 of 73
Association for the period of July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2026; and salary
increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
agreements shall be funded as follows:
(1) Fiscal year 2025.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
* * *
(2) Fiscal year 2026.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
* * *
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 43 of 73
Sec. 59. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 7 is amended to read:
Sec. 7. TELEPHONE TAX; REPEAL; TRANSITION
(a) 32 V.S.A. § 8521 (telephone personal property tax) is repealed on July
1, 2025 2026. The final monthly installment payment of the telephone
personal property tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8521 levied on the net book value of
the taxpayer’s personal property as of December 31, 2024 2025 shall be due on
or before July 25, 2025 2026.
(b) 32 V.S.A. § 8522 (alternative telephone gross revenues tax) is repealed
on January 1, 2026 2027. The final quarterly payment of the alternative tax
under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due on or before January 25, 2026 2027.
(c) Any taxpayer who paid the alternative tax imposed by 32 V.S.A. § 8522
prior to the repeal of the tax on January 1, 2026 2027 shall become subject to
the income tax imposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151 beginning with the
taxpayer’s first income tax year starting on or after January 1, 2025 2026. No
alternative tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due for any period included in
the taxpayer’s income tax filing for tax years starting on or after January 1,
2025 2026.
(d) In fiscal year 2025 2026, the Division of Property Valuation and
Review of the Department of Taxes and all communications service providers
with taxable communications property in Vermont shall be subject to the
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 44 of 73
inventory and valuation provisions prescribed in 32 V.S.A. § 4452, as
applicable.
Sec. 60. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
* * *
(3) Secs. 8–12 (communications property tax) shall take effect on July 1,
2025 2026 and shall apply to grand lists lodged on or after April 1, 2025 2026.
Sec. 61. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 166, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION
Notwithstanding 7 V.S.A. § 845(c), in fiscal year 2025:
(1) $500,000.00 is transferred from the Cannabis Regulation Fund
established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 845 to the Cannabis Business Development
Fund established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987; and
(2) $500,000.00 is appropriated from the Cannabis Business 19
Development Fund to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
Department of Economic Development to fund technical assistance and
provide loans and grants pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987.
Sec. 62. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 78 is amended to read:
Sec. 78. TRANSFERS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 45 of 73
Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), 32 V.S.A. §
9610(c), or any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts in excess of
$32,954,775.00 from the property transfer tax shall be transferred into the
General Fund. Of this amount:
(1) $6,106,335.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund.
(2) $1,279,740.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. 63. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 96 is amended to read:
Sec. 96. APPROPRIATION; RENT ARREARS ASSISTANCE FUND
The sum of $2,500,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Vermont State Housing Authority Department of Housing and Community
Development in fiscal year 2025 for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund
established by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 45.
Sec. 64. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 182, Sec. 3, as amended by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 75, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.119, and
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 106, is further amended to read:
Sec. 3. MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) Amounts Of the amounts available from the American Rescue Plan Act
– State Fiscal Recovery funds, $4,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 46 of 73
Housing and Community Development for the Manufactured Home
Improvement and Repair Program and shall be used for one or more of the
following purposes:
* * *
Sec. 65. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 113b is amended to read:
Sec. 113b. APPROPRIATION; NATURAL RESOURCES LAND USE
REVIEW BOARD
The sum of $1,300,000.00 $400,000 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board in fiscal year 2025.
Sec. 66. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 183, Sec. 24a is amended to read:
Sec. 24a. COMPENSATION FOR OVERPAYMENT
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$29,224.00 a $29,224 credit shall be transferred from the Education Fund to
the Town of applied to the Canaan Town School District’s education spending,
as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the
homestead taxpayers of the Town of Canaan Town School District for an
overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to erroneous
accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating average daily
membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made directly to the
Town of Canaan.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 47 of 73
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$5,924.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Bloomfield in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Bloomfield for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Bloomfield.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,575.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Brunswick in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Brunswick for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Brunswick.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$6,145.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of East
Haven in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town
of East Haven for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of East Haven.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 48 of 73
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,046.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Granby
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Granby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Granby.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$10,034.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Guildhall in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Guildhall for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Guildhall.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$20,536.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Kirby
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Kirby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Kirby.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 49 of 73
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,402.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Lemington in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Lemington for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Lemington.
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$11,464.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Maidstone in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Maidstone for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Maidstone.
(j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$4,349.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Norton
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Norton for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Norton.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 50 of 73
(k) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,657.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Victory
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Victory for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Victory.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a $68,132 credit shall
be applied to the Northeast Kingdom Choice School District’s education
spending, as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to
compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Northeast Kingdom Choice School
District for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership.
Sec. 67. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1100, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 40 and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
C.101, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2024 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated
for the following:
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 51 of 73
(1) $2,300,000 General Fund to create, implement, and oversee a
comprehensive statewide language access plan;.
(2) $15,000,000 General Fund to be used to offset the cost of denied
claims for Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) federal
reimbursement related to presidentially declared disasters in fiscal year 2024 or
2025, or to fund unanticipated statewide costs related to recovery efforts from
declared disasters or administering programs created by funds from the
American Rescue Plan Act – State Fiscal Recovery Fund, including the costs
of related limited-service positions, and contracting for programs and services.
(3) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity. These funds shall not be released until the recommendation and report
required by Sec. E.100.1 of this act, regarding the permanent administrative
location for the Office of Health Equity, is provided to the committees of
jurisdiction listed in Sec. E.100.1 of this act and the positions in the Office of
Health Equity created by this act are filled.
* * *
(l) Agency of Human Services Central Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds
are appropriated for the following:
* * *
(2) $8,834,000 General Fund and $11,483,302 Federal Revenue Fund
#22005 for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 52 of 73
program. Funds shall be used to expand the substances covered by the
program, include mental health and pediatric screenings, and make strategic
investments with community partners; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *
(m) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2024, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $366,066 General Fund and $372,048 Federal Revenue Fund #22005
for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
program; unexpended appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal
years and remain available for this purpose;
(2) $15,583,352 Global Commitment Fund #20405 for a two-year pilot
to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended
appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain
available for this purpose; and
* * *
(n) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $4,595,448 Global Commitment Fund #20405 to the Division of
Substance Use Programs for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 53 of 73
Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *
(ee) Joint Fiscal Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1) $250,000 for per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses
for members of the Task Force on Economic Development Incentives and for
consulting services approved by the Task Force consulting services related to
legislative needs identified in the 2025-2026 biennium, including analysis of
legislative staff compensation and organizational structure and implementation
of adjustments in accordance with policies adopted by the Joint Legislative
Management Committee.
* * *
Sec. 68. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1102, as added by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 47, is amended to read:
Sec. B.1102 FISCAL YEAR 2023 ONE-TIME TECHNOLOGY
MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2023, funds are appropriated from the Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951) for new and ongoing initiatives as
follows:
(1) $40,010,000 to the Agency of Digital Services to be used as follows:
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 54 of 73
(A) $11,800,000 for Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system
upgrade of Human Capital Management and core statewide financial
accounting system and integration with the Department of Labor and Agency
of Transportation financial systems;
* * *
Sec. 69. 3 V.S.A. § 3306 is amended to read:
§ 3306. TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND
* * *
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(2) any interest earned by the Fund.
* * *
Sec. 70. WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND TRAINING FUND; REPEAL
(a) 10 V.S.A. § 543 (Workforce Education and Training Fund) is repealed.
Sec. 71. 18 V.S.A. § 9502 is amended to read:
§ 9502. TOBACCO TRUST FUND
(a)(1) The Tobacco Trust Fund is established in the Office of the State
Treasurer for the purposes of creating a self-sustaining, perpetual fund for
tobacco cessation and prevention that is not dependent upon tobacco sales
volume.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 55 of 73
(2) The Trust Fund shall comprise be composed of:
(A) appropriations transfers made by the General Assembly; and
(B) transfers from the Litigation Settlement Fund pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this section; and
(C) contributions from any other source.
(3) The State Treasurer shall not disburse monies from the Trust Fund,
except upon appropriation by the General Assembly. In any fiscal year, total
appropriations from the Trust Fund shall not exceed seven percent of the fair
market value of the Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year.
(4) The Trust Fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The
Treasurer may invest monies in the Fund in accordance with the provisions of
32 V.S.A. § 434. All balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be
carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The Treasurer’s
annual financial report to the Governor and the General Assembly shall contain
an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the Fund.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by the General Assembly on or before
June 30, 2000, and on June 30 of each subsequent fiscal year, any
unencumbered balance in the Litigation Settlement Fund shall be transferred to
the Trust Fund. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 56 of 73
Sec. 72. 30 V.S.A. chapter 86 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 86. UNDERGROUND UTILITY DAMAGE PREVENTION
SYSTEM
* * *
§ 7006. MARKING OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITIES
A company notified in accordance with section 7005 of this title shall,
within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of the
receipt of the notice, mark the approximate location of its underground utility
facilities in the area of the proposed excavation activities; provided, however,
if the company advises the person that the proposed excavation area is of such
length or size that the company cannot reasonably mark all of the underground
utility facilities within 48 72 hours, the person shall notify the company of the
specific locations in which the excavation activities will first occur and the
company shall mark facilities in those locations within 48 72 hours and the
remaining facilities within a reasonable time thereafter. A company and an
excavator may by agreement fix a later time for the company’s marking of the
facilities, provided the marking is made prior to excavation activities. For the
purposes of this chapter, the approximate location of underground facilities
shall be marked with stakes, paint, or other physical means as designated by
the Commission.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 57 of 73
§ 7006a. MAINTENANCE OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITY
MARKINGS
After a company has marked its underground facilities in accordance with
section 7006 of this title, the excavator shall be responsible for maintenance of
the designated markings. In the event said markings are obliterated, destroyed,
or removed, the person engaged in excavation activities shall notify the System
referred to in section 7002 of this title that remarking is needed. The System
shall then notify all member companies whose facilities may be affected. The
company shall within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal
holidays, following receipt of the notice, remark the location of its
underground utility facilities.
* * *
Sec. 73. 32 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
§ 5. ACCEPTANCE OF GRANTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Loan” means a loan that is interest free or below market value.
(2) “State agency” means an Executive Branch agency, department,
commission, office, or board.
* * *
Sec. 74. 32 V.S.A. § 706 is amended to read:
§ 706. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 58 of 73
Notwithstanding any authority granted elsewhere, all transfers of
appropriations shall be made pursuant to this section upon the initiative of the
Governor or upon the request of a secretary or commissioner.
(1) With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Finance
and Management may transfer balances of appropriations not to exceed
$50,000.00 $100,000 made under any appropriation act for the support of the
government from one component of an agency, department, or other unit of
State government to any component of the same agency, department, or unit.
(2) Except as specified in subdivisions subdivision (1) and (4) of this
section, the transfer of balances of appropriations may be made only with the
approval of the Emergency Board.
(3) For the specific purpose of balancing and closing out fund accounts
at the end of a fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and Management may
adjust a balance within an account of an agency or department in an amount
not to exceed $100.00 $200.
* * *
Sec. 75. 32 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. AUTHORIZATION TO BORROW MONEY
* * *
(b) The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of and expenses
of preparing, issuing, and marketing of such notes as the same fall due without
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 59 of 73
further order or authority from the General Fund or from the Transportation or
other applicable funds or from the proceeds of bonds or notes governmental
debt service funds established in section 951a of this chapter. The authority
hereby granted is in addition to and not in limitation of any other authority.
Such notes shall be sold at public or private sale with or without published
notice, as the State Treasurer may determine to be in the best interests of the
State.
Sec. 76. 32 V.S.A. § 951a is amended to read:
§ 951a. DEBT SERVICE FUNDS
(a) Three governmental debt service funds are hereby established:
* * *
(b) Financial resources in each fund shall consist of appropriations by the
General Assembly to fulfill debt service obligations, the transfer of funding
sources by the General Assembly to fulfill future debt service obligations,
bond proceeds raised to fund a permanent reserve required by a trust
agreement entered into to secure bonds, transfers of appropriations effected
pursuant to section 706 of this title, investment income earned on balances held
in trust agreement accounts as required by a trust agreement, and such other
amounts as directed by the General Assembly or that are specifically
authorized by provisions of this title. Each debt service fund shall account for
the accumulation of resources and the fulfillment of debt service obligations
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 60 of 73
within the current fiscal year and the accumulation of resources for debt
service obligations maturing in future fiscal years.
* * *
Sec. 77. 32 V.S.A. § 954 is amended to read:
§ 954. PROCEEDS
(a) The proceeds arising from the sale of bonds, inclusive of any premiums,
shall be applied to the purposes for which they were authorized, and the
purposes shall may be considered to include the expenses of preparing, issuing,
and marketing the bonds and any notes issued under section 955 of this title,
and underwriters’ fees and amounts for reserves, but no purchasers of the
bonds shall be in any way bound to see to the proper application of the
proceeds. The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of,
investment return on, and maturity value of the bonds and notes as the same
fall due or accrue without further order or authority. The State Treasurer, with
the approval of the Governor, may establish sinking funds, reserve funds, or
other special funds of the State as the State Treasurer may deem for the best
interests of the State. To the extent not otherwise provided, the amount
necessary each year to fulfill the maturing principal and interest of, investment
return and maturity value of, and sinking fund installments on all the bonds
then outstanding shall be included in and made a part of the annual
appropriation bill for the expense of State government, and the principal and
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 61 of 73
interest on, investment return and maturity value of, and sinking fund
installments on the bonds as may come due before appropriations for their
fulfillment have been made shall be fulfilled from the applicable debt service
fund.
(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated cost of bond
issuance or issuances to the entities to which funds are appropriated by a
capital construction act and for which bonding is required as the source of
funds. If estimated receipts are insufficient, the State Treasurer shall allocate
additional costs to the entities. Any remaining receipts shall not be expended,
but carried forward to be available for future capital construction acts. If the
source of funds appropriated by a capital construction act is other than by
issuance of bonds, the State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated
cost of ongoing debt management services to the entities to which those funds
are appropriated shall be appropriated annually from the funds from which
transfers are made to fund debt service costs.
* * *
Sec. 78. VERMONT TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY FUND; REPEAL
(a) 33 V.S.A. chapter 78 (Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund) is
repealed.
Sec. 79. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 38 is amended to read:
Sec. 38. RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 62 of 73
(a) Creation; administration. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall
design and implement a Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program and shall
create and administer a revolving loan fund to provide subsidized loans for
rental housing developments that serve middle-income households.
(b) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
* * *
(7) The Agency shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that:
(A) a subsidized unit remains affordable to a household earning the
applicable percent of area median income for the longer of:
(i) seven years; or
(ii) full repayment of the loan plus three years; and
(B) during the affordability period determined pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7), the annual increase in rent for a
subsidized unit does not exceed three percent or an amount otherwise
authorized by the Agency.
* * *
Sec. 80. 32 V.S.A. § 308b is amended to read:
§ 308b. HUMAN SERVICES CASELOAD RESERVE
(a) There is created within the General Fund a Human Services Caseload
Reserve. Expenditures from the Reserve shall be subject to an appropriation
by the General Assembly or approval by the Emergency Board. Expenditures
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 63 of 73
from the Reserve shall be limited to Agency of Human Services caseload-
related needs primarily in the Departments for Children and Families, of
Health, of Mental Health, of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of
Vermont Health Access, and settlement costs associated with managing the
Global Commitment waiver.
(b) The Secretary of Administration may transfer to the Human Services
Caseload Reserve any General Fund carry-forward carryforward directly
attributable to Agency of Human Services caseload reductions and the
effective management of related federal receipts, with the exclusion of the
Department of Corrections.
(c) The Human Services Caseload Reserve shall contain two sub-accounts
subaccounts:
(1) A sub-account subaccount for incurred but not reported Medicaid
expenses. Each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2020, the Department of
Finance and Management shall adjust the amount reserved for incurred but not
reported Medicaid expenses to equal the amount specified in the
Comprehensive Annual Comprehensive Financial Report for the fiscal year
occurring two years prior for the estimated amount of incurred but not reported
Medicaid expenses associated with the current Medicaid Global Commitment
waiver.
* * *
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 64 of 73
Sec. 81. CHILD CARE CONTRIBUTION SPECIAL FUND;
UNALLOCATED AND UNRESERVED BALANCE
(a) In fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration shall unreserve and
transfer funds from the Human Services Caseload Reserve to the Child Care
Contribution Special Fund established in 32 V.S.A. § 10554 as necessary to
maintain a balance that appropriately supports the State’s statutory obligations
under the Child Care Financial Assistance Program established in 33 V.S.A.
§§ 3512 and 3513.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any unreserved and
unallocated balance in the Child Care Contribution Special Fund shall remain
in the Fund to support the future establishment of a reserve for the Child Care
Financial Assistance Program.
Sec. 82. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FACILITY WORK
PROGRAMS; STRATEGIC PLAN
(a) Findings and intent.
(1) The General Assembly finds that a significant budget deficit has
developed within previously existing programs despite a wage structure that
pays incarcerated individuals in Vermont at rates ranging from $0.25 to $1.35
per hour, significantly below the federal minimum wage.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all Department of
Corrections facility work programs operate in a manner that is fiscally
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 65 of 73
sustainable to the extent possible within current statutory limitations and
effective in preparing offenders for meaningful employment upon release.
(b) Strategic plan. On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of
Corrections shall, in consultation with the Department of Labor, submit a
strategic plan with proposed benchmarks for improvement to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Corrections and Institutions and the
Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Institutions, and on Judiciary. The
strategic plan shall include:
(1) A business plan to improve program efficiency and self-
sustainability to ensure all facility work programs, including Vermont
Correctional Industries, vocational training programs, and other paid facility
duties, operate without recurring deficits or to clearly identify funding sources
to address the deficits.
(2) A comprehensive evaluation of the skills provided through facility
work programs to determine if those skills are transferable to employment
opportunities post-incarceration. The evaluation shall include consideration of
expanding technical training and certification opportunities that carry
recognized value in the labor market.
(3) An analysis of facility work programs to determine if each program
serves a sufficient portion of the incarcerated population to justify its
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 66 of 73
administration. The analysis shall also consider whether participants gain
meaningful and valuable work experiences.
(4) A review of wages paid to facility work program participants, the
implications of wage structures on program outcomes, and the appropriate use
of funds in relation to program objectives.
(c) In fiscal years 2025 and 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
submit timely reports to the House Committees on Appropriations and on
Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Appropriations, on
Institutions, and on Judiciary, or the Joint Fiscal Committee and the Joint
Legislative Justice Oversight Committee when the General Assembly is not in
session, on the development of facility work program deficits. The
Department shall include in these reports any financial or operational actions
taken to address deficits, increase oversight, and prevent future deficits.
Sec. 83. MEDICAID PROVIDERS WITH STABILIZATION NEEDS;
GRANT ELIGIBILITY
(a) All Vermont Medicaid participating providers with demonstrated
stabilization needs and a plan to achieve sustainability shall be eligible to apply
for funds appropriated pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
B.1100(o)(4), including substance use residential treatment facilities, federally
qualified health centers, residential mental health providers, and other
providers of health care and human services.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 67 of 73
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of Vermont Health
Access shall submit a report to the House Committees on Health Care and on
Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on
Appropriations. The report shall include:
(1) A detailed account of grants distributed pursuant to the appropriation
made in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100(o)(4), as added by this
act. This shall include the dollar amount and recipient of each grant.
(2) A description of each grant recipient’s financial status prior to
receipt of the grant, a summary of the impact of the grant for each recipient,
and a summary of a revised long-term sustainability plan for each grant
recipient.
(3) An analysis of grant outcomes and any recommendations for
enhancing the financial stability of Vermont Medicaid providers.
Sec. 84. ADULT DIPLOMA PROGRAM AND HIGH SCHOOL
COMPLETION PROGRAM TRANSITIONAL STUDENTS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 945 and any other provision of law to the
contrary, a high school may award a high school diploma to any student who
meets the following criteria:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2024, the student was participating in the High
School Completion Program as the program existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 68 of 73
(2) The student has met the requirements of the student’s individual
graduation plan and would have been eligible to receive a diploma pursuant to
the High School Completion Program as it existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
(b) This section is repealed on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 85. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
DISCRETIONARY EXEMPTIONS
(a) For the remainder of federal fiscal year 2025, the Department for
Children and Families shall utilize the State’s allocation of discretionary
exemptions in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to the extent
permitted by federal regulation for the purposes of:
(1) extending benefits to Program participants who would otherwise
experience a disruption of benefits; and
(2) ensuring that Program participants are not accruing any time-limited
benefit work requirement countable months.
Sec. 86. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Secs. 5 and 6 are amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 4 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2023.
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 69 of 73
(b) Sec. 5 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2025.
(c) All other sections shall take effect 30 calendar days after passage.
Sec. 87. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15b, as added by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 162, is amended to read:
Sec. 15b. SERGEANT AT ARMS
(a) The sum of $100,000.00 $100,000 is appropriated in FY fiscal year
2025 to the Sergeant at Arms for the following projects:
(1) the replacement of State House cafeteria furnishings; and
(2) the purchase and installation at the State House of an X-ray machine
designed to screen baggage.
Sec. 88. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.321 is amended to read:
Sec. E.321 GENERAL ASSISTANCE EMERGENCY HOUSING
* * *
(b)(1) General Assistance Emergency Housing shall be provided in a
community-based shelter whenever possible. If there is inadequate
community-based shelter space available within the Agency of Human
Services district in which the household presents itself, the household shall be
provided emergency housing in a hotel or motel within the district, if available,
until adequate community-based shelter space becomes available in the
district. The utilization of hotel and motel rooms pursuant to this subdivision
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 70 of 73
shall be capped at 1,100 rooms per night between September 15, 2024 through
November 30, 2024 and between April 1, 2025 through June 30, 2025.
* * *
(3) The Department shall provide emergency winter housing to
households meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (a) of this section
between December 1, 2024 and March 31, June 30, 2025. Emergency housing
in a hotel or motel provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not count toward
the maximum days of eligibility per 12-month period provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. 89. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 82, Sec. 1, as amended by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 108, Sec. 3, is further amended to read:
Sec. 1. REIMBURSEMENT TO MUNICIPALITIES OF STATE
EDUCATION PROPERTY TAXES THAT WERE ABATED DUE
TO FLOODING
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Taxes may approve an application by a
municipality for reimbursement of State education property tax payments owed
under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16 V.S.A. § 426. To be eligible for
reimbursement under this section, prior to November 15, 2024 2025, a
municipality must have abated, in proportion to the abated municipal tax,
under 24 V.S.A. § 1535 the State education property taxes that were assessed
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 71 of 73
on eligible property, after application of any property tax credit allowed under
32 V.S.A. chapter 154.
(2) As used in this subsection, “eligible property” means property lost
or destroyed due directly or indirectly to severe storms and flooding in an area
that was declared a federal disaster between July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023
December 31, 2024, provided the loss or destruction resulted in one or more of
the following:
(A) a 50 percent or greater loss in value to the primary structure on
the property;
(B) loss of use by the property owner of the primary structure on the
property for 60 days or more;
(C) loss of access by the property owner to utilities for the primary
structure on the property for 60 days or more; or
(D) condemnation of the primary structure on the property under
federal, State, or municipal law, as applicable.
(b) If a municipality demonstrates that, due to disruption to tax collections
resulting from flooding in an area that was declared a federal disaster between
July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023 December 31, 2024, the municipality
incurred unanticipated interest expenses on funds borrowed to make State
education property tax payments owed under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16
V.S.A. § 426, the municipality may be reimbursed by an amount equal to its
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 72 of 73
reasonable interest expenses under this subsection, provided the amount of
reimbursed interest expenses shall not exceed eight percent.
* * *
Sec. 90. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.106 is amended to read:
Sec. E.106 CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND
APPROPRIATIONS; REVERSION AND ESTABLISHMENT
OF NEW SPENDING AUTHORITY
* * *
(b) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall revert all
unobligated American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery
Fund spending authority prior to December 31, 2024. The total amount of
American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund
spending authority reverted in accordance with this subsection shall equal the
amount of new spending authority established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 511 for
the following purposes in the following order:
* * *
(3) $30,000,000 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to
provide support and enhance capacity for the production and preservation of:
affordable mixed-income rental housing and homeownership units, including
improvements to manufactured homes and communities,; permanent homes
and emergency shelter for those experiencing homelessness,; recovery
VT LEG #382391 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE AND SENATE H.489
2025 Page 73 of 73
residences,; and housing available to farm workers, refugees, and individuals
who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home and community based
services.
Sec. 91. CARRYFORWARD AUTHORITY
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law and subject to the approval
of the Secretary of Administration, General Fund, Transportation Fund,
Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund, Education Fund, Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951), Clean Water Fund (21932), and
Agricultural Water Quality Fund (21933) appropriations remaining
unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Executive Branch shall be carried forward
and shall be designated for expenditure.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, General
Fund appropriations remaining unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Legislative
and Judicial Branches shall be carried forward and shall be designated for
expenditure.
Sec. 92. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This act shall take effect on passage, except that, notwithstanding
1 V.S.A. § 214:
(1) Sec. 66 shall take effect retroactively on July 1, 2024; and
(2) Sec. 89 shall take effect retroactively on November 15, 2024.
VT LEG #382391 v.1